Utah statutes.
67-4a-213.   Contents of safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository.

All tangible and intangible property held in a safe deposit box or any other safekeeping repository in this state in the ordinary course of the holder's business and all proceeds resulting from the sale of the property permitted by other law that remain unclaimed by the owner for more than five years after the lease or rental period on the box or other repository has expired are considered abandoned.

